apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_num.ca.dix
    <pardef n="vint__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-un</l>
          <r>-un</r>
        </p>
        <par n="un(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-d</l>
          <r>-d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="d/os(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-tres</l>
          <r>-tres</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-quatre</l>
          <r>-quatre</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-cinc</l>
          <r>-cinc</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-sis</l>
          <r>-sis</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-set</l>
          <r>-set</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-vuit</l>
          <r>-vuit</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-i-nou</l>
          <r>-nou</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="trenta__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-un</l>
          <r>-un</r>
        </p>
        <par n="un(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-d</l>
          <r>-d</r>
        </p>
        <par n="d/os(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-tres</l>
          <r>-tres</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-quatre</l>
          <r>-quatre</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-cinc</l>
          <r>-cinc</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-sis</l>
          <r>-sis</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-set</l>
          <r>-set</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-vuit</l>
          <r>-vuit</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-nou</l>
          <r>-nou</r>
        </p>
        <par n="tres(1)__num"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="mil__num">
   <!--   <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil</l>
          <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>cent</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>dos-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>dues-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>tres-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>tres-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>quatre-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>cinc-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>sis-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>sis-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>set-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>set-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>vuit-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>nou-cents</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>mil<b/>nou-centes</l>
          <r><b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

 <pardef n="mil(1)__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>cent</l>
          <r>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>dos-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>dues-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>tres-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>tres-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>quatre-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>quatre-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>cinc-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>cinc-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>sis-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>sis-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>set-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>set-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>vuit-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>vuit-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>nou-cents</l>
          <r>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil<b/>nou-centes</l>
          <r>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

<e lm="vint"><i>vint</i><par n="vint__num"/></e>
<e lm="trenta"><i>trenta</i><par n="trenta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quaranta"><i>quaranta</i><par n="trenta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquanta"><i>cinquanta</i><par n="trenta__num"/></e>
<e lm="seixanta"><i>seixanta</i><par n="trenta__num"/></e>
<e lm="setanta"><i>setanta</i><par n="trenta__num"/></e>
<e lm="vuitanta"><i>vuitanta</i><par n="trenta__num"/></e>
<e lm="noranta"><i>noranta</i><par n="trenta__num"/></e>
<e lm="tres" r="RL"><i>tres</i><par n="mil__num"/></e>
<e lm="quatre" r="RL"><i>quatre</i><par n="mil__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinc" r="RL"><i>cinc</i><par n="mil__num"/></e>
<e lm="sis" r="RL"><i>sis</i><par n="mil__num"/></e>
<e lm="set" r="RL"><i>set</i><par n="mil__num"/></e>
<e lm="vuit" r="RL"><i>vuit</i><par n="mil__num"/></e>
<e lm="nou" r="RL"><i>nou</i><par n="mil__num"/></e>
<e lm="mil cent, etc." r="RL"><i></i><par n="mil(1)__num"/></e>
